Maine, session 132, LD162.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Bridge in Carmel renamed. Resolved: That the Department of
Transportation shall designate Bridge 2976 on Main Road, which crosses the former Maine
Central Railroad line in the Town of Carmel and is currently known as the Maine Central
Railroad Crossing Bridge, the Kevin M. Howell Memorial Bridge.